Louisiana, session 2026, HB824.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:34(C), 38(B), and 54(C) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 39:33.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§33.3. Determination of Government Growth Limit
A. The Revenue Estimating Conference shall establish the Government
Growth Limit, hereafter referred to in this Section as the "growth limit", no later than
the first quarter of each calendar year for the next fiscal year. Except as provided in
Subsection D of this Section, the commissioner of administration shall cause a
calculation of the ensuing year's growth limit to be submitted to the Revenue
Estimating Conference each year.
B. After adoption by the Revenue Estimating Conference, the chairman of
the conference shall submit the growth limit for the ensuing fiscal year to the Joint
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1196 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 824
Legislative Committee on the Budget by the deadline for submission of the executive
budget to such committee.
C.(1) If the growth factor provided in this Paragraph is positive, the growth
limit for the ensuing fiscal year shall be calculated as the sum of the base plus the
result of the base times the growth factor in accordance with the following
provisions:
(a) The growth factor shall only be applied to the base once for each annual
calculation and shall equal the sum of the following:
(i) The average annual percentage rate of change in population for Louisiana,
as defined and reported by the United States Department of Commerce, or its
successor agency, for the five calendar years prior to the fiscal year for which the
limit is calculated.
(ii) The average of the following:
(aa) The average annual percentage rate of change through December of the
chained consumer price index for the United States as defined and reported by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, or its successor
agency, for the five calendar years prior to the fiscal year for which the limit is
calculated.
(bb) The average annual percentage rate of change through December of the
chained consumer medical care price index for the United States as defined and
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, or its
successor agency, for the five calendar years prior to the fiscal year for which the
limit is calculated.
(b) The figures used for the calculation of the growth factor shall be those
actual or estimated figures most recently reported at the time the growth limit is
adopted by the Revenue Estimating Conference.
(c) The base shall be the total of appropriations for ordinary recurring
expenses from the State General Fund (Direct) means of finance for the immediately
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1196 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 824
prior fiscal year; however, the base shall not include any appropriations made
pursuant to Subsection D and Paragraphs (E)(2) and (3) of this Section.
(2) If the growth factor provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection is
negative, the growth limit for the ensuing fiscal year shall be equal to the base, as
defined in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
D. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, if the
legislature changes the limit for a fiscal year pursuant to Article VII, Section 10(C)
of the Constitution of Louisiana, the limit for the immediately following fiscal year
shall equal the last limit established by the Revenue Estimating Conference.
E. The limit calculated pursuant to the provisions of this Subparagraph shall
not apply to the appropriation of the following:
(1) Any funds from the Budget Stabilization Fund or the Louisiana Income
Tax Elimination Fund incorporated into the official forecast for the current fiscal
year.
(2) Any funds appropriated as a result of a means of financing substitution
resulting in an increase in the State General Fund (Direct) means of finance to
compensate for a decrease in federal funding, funds transferred from another state
entity, self-generated collections, or statutorily or constitutionally dedicated funds.
(3) Any funds appropriated or allocated that are excluded from the analysis
of appropriation totals in relation to the expenditure limit.
§34. Executive budget
* * *
C. The executive budget recommendations for appropriations shall not
exceed the expenditure limit for the ensuing fiscal year. Additionally, executive
budget recommendations for appropriation of recurring revenue shall not exceed the
applicable government growth limit.
* * *
§38. Additional proposals
* * *
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1196 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 824
B. Any proposal by the governor to exceed the expenditure limit limit, the
government growth limit, or both shall be itemized by program and shall constitute
a submission by the governor separate and apart from the executive budget.
* * *
§54. Limitations on appropriations
* * *
C. Appropriations by the legislature from the state general fund and
dedicated funds for any fiscal year shall not exceed the expenditure limit and shall
be in conformity with the requirements of R.S. 39:33.3.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. 646 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is adopted
at a statewide election and becomes effective.